Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, SB313.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Section 1101-A of the act of June 3, 1937 (P.L.1333, No.320), known as the Pennsylvania Election Code, is amended by adding definitions to read:Section 1101-A. Definitions.--As used in this article:* * *"Ballot set" means one of any ballot type that is used for any method of voting, including absentee ballot voting, mail-in 12345678910111213141516171819202122232425 ballot voting, voting in-person at a polling place or voting by emergency paper ballot. Each ballot set shall consist of ballots with various ballot styles."Ballot style" means a ballot's particular array of election contests and candidates specific to an election district.* * *Section 2. Section 1110-A(d) and (e) of the act are amended and the section is amended by adding a subsection to read:Section 1110-A. Supplies; Preparation of the Voting System and of Polling Places.--* * *(a.1) Notwithstanding section 1007(a), for electronic voting systems utilizing paper ballots that are printed by the voting device at the polling place after the registered elector has made their selections, the county board of elections shall preprint official election ballots for use as emergency paper ballots if the voting device is not operable, and the county board of elections shall furnish the emergency paper ballots to each election district in an amount equal to at least twenty (20) per centum of the total number of registered electors in an election district.* * *[(d) On or before the fortieth day preceding any election, the county board of elections shall mail to the chairman of the county committee of each political party which shall be entitled under existing laws to participate in primary elections within the county, and to the chairman or presiding officer of any organization of citizens within the county which has as its purpose or among its purposes the investigation or prosecution of election frauds and which has registered its name and address and the names of its principal officers with the county board of 20250SB0313PN0247 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 elections at least fifty days before the election, a written notice stating the times when and the place or places where preparation of the system and its components for use in the several election districts in the county or municipality will be started. One representative of each such political party, certified by the respective chairman of the county committee of such party, and one representative of each such organization of citizens, certified by the respective chairman or presiding officer of such organization shall be entitled to be present during the preparation of the voting system and its components and to see that they are properly prepared and are in proper condition and order for use. Such representatives shall not interfere with the preparation of the system and its components, and the county board may make reasonable rules and regulations governing the conduct of such representatives.(e) Prior to the delivery of any automatic tabulating equipment to any election district the county board of elections shall examine or cause to have examined such equipment and shall make a certificate stating:(1) the identifying number and election district designation of the equipment;(2) that the equipment is suitable for use in the particular election district designated;(3) that the equipment has been tested to ascertain that it will accurately compute the votes cast for all offices and all questions;(4) that the offices and questions on the official ballot correspond in all respects with the ballot labels assigned to such particular election district;(5) that the public counter and the counters for each 20250SB0313PN0247 - 3 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 candidate position and each question are all set at zero and that element that generates a printed record of the results of the election is functioning correctly; and(6) the number on the seal with which the equipment is sealed.]* * *Section 3. The act is amended by adding sections to read:Section 1110.1-A. Pre-election Logic and Accuracy Testing.--(a) Prior to any election in which an electronic voting system may be used, the county board of elections shall complete logic and accuracy testing under this section to ensure that electronic voting equipment functions as expected and that votes are accurately tabulated. The logic and accuracy testing shall be sufficient to determine that the voting system is properly programmed, the election is correctly defined on the voting system and all of the voting system input, output and communication devices are working properly.(b) Logic and accuracy testing shall be completed as soon as ballots are available. If any proceeding is pending in a Federal or State court which would affect the contents of any ballot, testing shall be completed no later than the eleventh day prior to the election.(c) During logic and accuracy testing, the county board of elections shall:(1) For each electronic voting device which may be used in the upcoming election:(i) Generate a report which shows the contest order and confirm that the contest order as reported matches the expected contest order.(ii) Mark, in all available languages, and print ballots for 20250SB0313PN0247 - 4 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 each ballot style using the touchscreen and any other assistive device provided by the manufacturer and using a predetermined voting pattern designed so that each contest, and each choice within each contest, is given a unique number of votes.(iii) Review the printed ballots to ensure that the ballots were accurately printed and the votes contained on the printed ballot match the choices designated by the tester.(iv) Scan the printed ballots to ensure that the ballots will scan and generate the expected results.(v) Shut down, lock and seal the voting device.(vi) Execute a written statement setting forth the electronic voting devices tested, the results of the testing, the protective counter numbers, if applicable, of each voting device, the number of the seal securing each voting device at the conclusion of testing, any problems reported to the board as a result of the testing and whether each electronic voting device tested is satisfactory or unsatisfactory.(vii) Prior to the delivery of an electronic voting device to an election district, examine, or cause to be examined, the equipment and shall make a certificate stating the identifying number and election district designation of the equipment.(2) For each piece of automatic tabulating equipment which may be used in the upcoming election:(i) Generate a report which shows the total number of votes for all contests and candidates and confirm that the totals show as zero for all contests and candidates.(ii) Scan premarked ballots for each ballot style using a predetermined voting pattern designed so that each contest, and each choice within each contest, is given a unique number of votes.20250SB0313PN0247 - 5 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (iii) Generate a report which shows the vote totals for each contest and candidate and compare the reported results to the expected results to ensure that the automatic tabulating equipment will generate the expected results.(iv) Reset all vote totals, shut down, lock and seal the automated tabulating equipment.(v) Execute a written statement setting forth the automatic tabulation equipment tested, the results of the testing, the protective counter numbers, if applicable, of each automatic tabulating device, the number of the seal securing each automatic tabulating device at the conclusion of testing, any problems reported to the board as a result of the testing and whether each device tested is satisfactory or unsatisfactory.(vi) Prior to the delivery of automatic tabulating equipment to an election district, examine, or cause to be examined, the equipment and shall make a certificate stating the identifying number and election district designation of the equipment.(d) The Secretary of the Commonwealth may prescribe additional requirements relating to logic and accuracy testing as the Secretary of the Commonwealth deems appropriate and may issue directives and instructions for implementation of this section. Directives issued by the Secretary of the Commonwealth may not conflict with the requirements on this section.(e) No later than seven days prior to beginning logic and accuracy testing, the county board of elections shall give notice of the location, date and time that logic and accuracy testing will be conducted as follows:(1) The county board of elections shall mail notice to the chairman of the county committee of each political party entitled under law to participate in primary elections within 20250SB0313PN0247 - 6 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 the county, and to the chairman or presiding officer of any organization of citizens within the county which has as a purpose or among multiple purposes the investigation or prosecution of election frauds and which has registered the organization's name and address and the names of each principal officer with the county board of elections by the first Monday in February of the year.(2) The county board of elections shall post notice to the board's publicly accessible Internet website.(3) The county board of elections shall publish notice in accordance with section 106.(f) The county board of elections shall allow in-person observation of the logic and accuracy testing. The following shall apply:(1) One representative from each political party whose chairman was entitled to receive notice under subsection (e)(1) may observe the logic and accuracy testing if the representative is certified by the chairman of the county committee of the party.(2) One representative of each organization entitled to receive notice under subsection (e)(1) may observe the logic and accuracy testing if the representative is certified by the chairman or presiding officer of the organization.(3) Any registered elector of the county who gives the county board of elections at least twenty-four hours' notice may observe the logic and accuracy testing.(4) A representative or a registered elector who observes the logic and accuracy testing shall not interfere with the testing.(5) The county board of elections may make reasonable rules 20250SB0313PN0247 - 7 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 and regulations governing the conduct of the representatives and registered electors. The rules and regulations must be published as part of the notice required under subsection (e).(g) No later than five days after completing logic and accuracy testing, the county board of elections shall certify compliance with the requirements of this section to the Secretary of the Commonwealth in a manner and on a form as prescribed by the Secretary of the Commonwealth. The Department of State shall post each certification received by the Secretary of the Commonwealth under this subsection to the Department of State's publicly accessible Internet website.(h) If the county board of elections fails to comply with this section, or with any directives or instructions issued by the Secretary of the Commonwealth under this section, the following shall apply:(1) Except as provided in paragraph (2) and section 1854, only the Secretary of the Commonwealth may bring an action to enforce this section and may introduce as evidence the failure of the county board of elections to comply with this section or any directives or instructions issued by the Secretary of the Commonwealth under this section.(2) The Department of State shall implement a system for a legally registered voter to submit complaints for noncompliance in accordance with the following:(i) After the submission of a complaint, the Department of State shall issue a decision in five business days.(ii) The decision may be appealed to Commonwealth Court.(iii) All expenses shall be paid by the voter.(3) The failure shall not be the sole cause or justification for delaying or refusing to perform any duty assigned under this 20250SB0313PN0247 - 8 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 act, including the county board of elections' duty to receive, canvass, compute and certify the returns of each election under section 302(k).Section 1856. Falsification of Election-related Documentation Regarding Pre-election Logic and Accuracy Testing.--The Secretary of the Commonwealth, member of a county board of elections, chief clerk, employe, overseer, judge of election, inspector of election, clerk of election, machine inspector or custodian or deputy custodian of voting machines on whom a duty is imposed by this act who knowingly makes a false statement, representation or certification in a list, record or other document required to be maintained under section 1110.1-A or who intentionally or deliberately refrains from complying with section 1110-A(a.1) or 1110.1-A commits a misdemeanor and, upon conviction thereof, shall be sentenced to pay a fine not exceeding one thousand ($1,000) dollars, or to undergo an imprisonment of not more than two (2) years, or both, in the discretion of the court.Section 4. This act shall take effect immediately.20250SB0313PN0247 - 9 - 12345678910111213141516171819